North Dakota, session 69, SB2070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 50-10.2-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-10.2-01. Definitions.
In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:
1. "Authorized electronic monitoringrecording" means the placement and use of an authorized
electronic monitoringrecording device, by a resident or resident representative, in the
resident's room.
2. "Authorized electronic monitoringrecording device" means video surveillance cameras,
monitoring devices, web-based cameras, video phones, or audio recording or transmitting
devices, or a combination of these devices,a device that is installed in the room of a resident
which are designed to acquire, transmit, broadcast, interact, oris intended to record or is
recording and transmitting video, communications, or other sounds occurring in the room. The
term does not include still cameras or devices used for the purpose of the resident having
contact with another person but not for the purpose of electronically monitoring a resident.
3. "Conflict of interest" means any type of ownership in a facility or membership on the governing
body of a facility by a provider of goods or services to that facility or by a member of that
individual's immediate family.
4. "Department" means the department of health and human services.
5. "Facility" means a skilled nursing care facility, basic care facility, assisted living facility, or
swing-bed hospital approved to furnish long-term care services.
6. "Immediate family" means husband, wife, father, mother, brother, sister, son, daughter,
father-in-law, mother-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepchild,
uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, or grandchild.
7. "Remodeling" means any alteration in structure, refurbishing, or repair that would:
a. Prevent the facility staff from providing customary and required care; or
b. Seriously endanger or inconvenience any resident with noise, dust, fumes, inoperative
equipment, or the presence of remodeling workers.
8. "Resident" means an individual residing in a facility.
9. "Resident representative" means a person authorized to act as a resident's agent under power
of attorney for health care or guardianship.
10. "Technology device" means a device capable of remote audio or video communications which
is used for the purpose of the resident having contact with another person but not for the

S. B. NO. 2070 - PAGE 2
purpose of virtual monitoring or recording audio or video of a resident and the resident's room.
A technology device includes a cellular mobile telephone used primarily for telephonic
communication, an electronic tablet not used for virtual monitoring or recording, and an
assistive communication device.
11. "Virtual monitoring" means remote live action monitoring conducted without recording of a
resident by a third party via the placement and use of a virtual monitoring device in the
resident's room.
12. "Virtual monitoring device" means a device owned and operated by the resident or resident
representative placed in the resident's room which allows live action monitoring without
recording of a resident by a third party.
13. "Virtual visitation" means remote visitation between a resident and another individual using a
technology device.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 50-10.2-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-10.2-02. Residents' rights - Implementation.
1. All facilities shall, upon a resident's admission, provide in hand to the resident and a member
of the resident's immediate family or any existing legal guardian of the resident representative
a statement of the resident's rights during the admission process and while living in the facility.
Within thirty days after admission, the statement must be orally explained to the resident and,
if the resident is unable to understand, to the resident's immediate family member or members
and any existing legal guardian of the resident representative, and thereafter annually so long
as the resident remains in the facility. The statement must include rights, responsibilities of
both the resident and the facility, and the facility rules governing resident conduct. FacilitiesA
facility shall treat residentsa resident in accordance with provisions of the statement. The
statement must include provisions ensuring each resident the following minimum rights:
a. The right to civil and religious liberties, including knowledge of available choices, the right
to independent personal decisions without infringement, and the right to encouragement
and assistance from the staff of the facility to promote the fullest possible exercise of
these rights.
b. The right to have private meetings, associations, and communications with any person of
the resident's choice within the facility.
c. The right to participate in the community.
d. The right of each resident, the resident's immediate family, any existing legal guardian of
the resident representative , friends, facility staff, and other persons to present complaints
on the behalf of the resident to the facility's staff, the facility's administrator, governmental
officials, or to any other person, without fear of reprisal, interference, coercion,
discrimination, or restraint. The facility shall adopt a grievance process and make the
process known to each resident and, if the resident is unable to understand, to the
resident's immediate family member or members and any existing legal guardian of the
resident. An individual making a complaint in good faith is immune from any civil liability
that otherwise might result from making the complaint.
d.e. The right to send and receive unopened personal mail and electronic mail and the right of
access to and use of telephones and electronic devices for private conversations.
e.f. The right to assured private visits, subject to restrictions to protect the health or safety of
the resident, by one's spouse, partner, or significant other, or if both are residents of the
same facility, the right to share a room, within the capacity of the facility, unless sharing a

S. B. NO. 2070 - PAGE 3
room is not medically advisable as documented in the medical records by the attending
physician.
f.g. The right to manage one's own financial affairs if not under legal guardianship, or to
delegate thatthe responsibility in writing to the administrator or manager of the facility, but
only to the extent of funds held in trust by the facility for the resident. If such a trust is
established, then a written quarterly accounting of any transactions made on behalf of
the resident must be furnished along with an explanation by the facility to the resident or
the person legally responsible for the resident.
g.h. The right to be fully informed in writing prior to or at the time of admission and during
one's stay, of services provided and the charges for those services, including ancillary
charges. Residents, or their legal guardians, must be informed at least thirty days prior to
any change in the costs or availability of the services. No facility may demand or receive
any advance payment or gratuity to assure admission.
h.i. The right to be adequately informed of one's medical condition and proposed treatment
and to participate in the planning of all medical treatment, including the right to refuse
medication and treatment, to be discharged from the facility upon written request, and to
be notified by the resident's attending physician of the medical consequences of any
such actions.
i.j. The right to have privacy in treatment and in caring for personal needs, to use personal
belongings, to have security in storing and using personal possessions, and to have
confidentiality in the treatment of personal and medical records. The resident has the
right to view, and authorize release of, any personal or medical records.
j.k. The right to keep and use personal possessions, including furnishings and clothing as
space permits, unless keeping or using the personal possession would infringe upon the
rights, health, or safety of another resident.
l. The right to be treated courteously, fairly, and with the fullest measure of dignity.
k.m. The right to be free from mental and physical abuse, neglect, and financial exploitation,
and the right to be free from physical or chemical restraint except in documented
emergencies or when necessary to protect the resident from injury to self or to others. In
such cases, the restraint must be authorized and documented by a physician for a limited
period of time and, if the restraint is a chemical one, it must be administered by a
licensed nurse or physician. Except as provided in this subdivision, drugs or physical
restraints may not be used or threatened to be used for the purposes of punishment, for
the convenience of staff, for behavior conditioning, as a substitute for rehabilitation or
treatment, or for any other purpose not part of an approved treatment plan.
l.n. The right not to be transferred or discharged except for:
(1) Medical reasons;
(2) The resident's welfare or that of other residentsthe safety of an individual in the
facility who is endangered due to the clinical or behavioral status of the resident;
(3) Nonpayment of one's rent or fees; or
(4) A temporary transfer during times of remodeling; or
(5) The facility ceases to operate.
m.o. The right to receive at least a thirty-day written advance notice of any transfer or
discharge when the resident is being discharged to another facility or the resident's own
home, or when the resident is being transferred or discharged because of a change in

S. B. NO. 2070 - PAGE 4
the resident's level of care; however, advance notice of transfer or discharge may be less
than thirty days if the resident has urgent medical needs that require a more immediate
transfer or discharge, or a more immediate transfer or discharge is required to protect the
health and safety of residents and staff within the facility.
n.p. The right to refuse to perform services on behalf of the facility, unless agreed to by the
resident or legal guardian and established in the plan of care.
o.q. The right to a claim for relief against a facility for any violation of rights guaranteed under
this chapter.
p.r. The right to have each facility display a notice that the following information is available
for public review and make the information available on request:
(1) A complete copy of every inspection report, deficiency report, and plan of correction
the facility received during the previous twothree years.
(2) The facility's grievance process.
(3) A copy of the statement of ownership, board membership, and partners.
(4) A statement of ownership setting forth any conflict of interest in the operation of the
facility.
q.s. The right to a pharmacist of the resident's choice irrespective of the type of medication
distribution system used by the facility, and to not be charged a fee or receive a financial
incentive or disincentive for choosing a pharmacy other than the facility's preferred
pharmacy. The resident may not be charged for repackaging if that cost can be included
on the facility cost report.
r.t. The right to not be discriminated against by a facility in the admissions process or in the
provision of appropriate care on the basis of the resident's source of payment to the
facility. Any applicant for admission to a facility who is denied admission must be given
the reason for the denial in writing upon request.
s.u. The right of residents and their families to organize, maintain, and participate in resident
advisory and family councils.
t.v. The right of residents receiving services performed by a provider from outside the facility
to be informed, on request, of the identity of the provider.
2. If there is a change in the resident rights, laws, or regulations, the facility shall promptly notify
the resident, and, if the resident is unable to understand, a member of the resident's
immediate family or the resident representative.
3. For involuntary transfer and discharge actions taken by a facility, the written transfer or
discharge notice issued by the facility must include:
a. The reason for the transfer or discharge.
b. The effective date of transfer or discharge.
c. The location the resident is to be transferred or discharged to.
d. The name, mailing and electronic mail address, and telephone number of the office of the
state long-term care ombudsman.
4. The facility shall protect the resident from retaliation. The facility shall adopt a grievance
process and make the process known to each resident, the resident's immediate family

S. B. NO. 2070 - PAGE 5
member, and the resident representative. A person making a complaint in good faith is
immune from any civil liability that otherwise might result from making the complaint.
5. If a trust is established by the facility to hold the resident's funds, the facility shall provide to
the resident, resident representative, or an agent under a power of attorney for financial
decisions a written quarterly accounting of transactions made on behalf of the resident,
including an explanation of the transactions by the facility. The facility shall pay out in full:
a. A resident's personal funds deposited with the facility or refunds due to the resident upon
discharge or eviction within thirty days, and provide a final accounting of those funds to
the resident, or in the case of death, in accordance with state law.
b. Refunds due as a result of an overpayment to the facility within thirty days from the date
the overpayment is discovered.
c. Other refunds due to the resident upon discharge, eviction, or death within thirty days
from the resident's date of discharge from the facility.
6. The facility shall inform a resident, resident representative, an agent under a power of attorney
for financial decisions, or immediate family member, at least thirty days before any change in
the costs or availability of the services. A facility may not demand or receive advance payment
or gratuity to assure admission or for the resident to be placed on a waiting list for admission.
7. A resident and the resident representative may view and authorize release of any personal or
medical records.
8. The use of a physical or chemical restraint in an emergency or if necessary to protect the
resident from injury to self or others must be authorized and documented by a physician,
nurse practitioner, or physician's assistant for a limited period of time. A chemical restraint
must be administered by a licensed nurse, physician, nurse practitioner, or physician's
assistant. Except as provided in this subsection, a drug or physical restraint may not be used
or threatened to be used for the purpose of punishment, for the convenience of staff, for
behavior conditioning, as a substitute for rehabilitation or treatment, or for any other purpose
not included in an approved treatment plan.
9. Upon request, a facility shall provide an applicant for admission to a facility who is denied
admission the reason for the denial in writing. The facility shall note in the written denial if the
denial is based on the special characteristics or service limitations of the facility.
10. A facility shall ensure a resident council meeting is attended by residents only or at the
invitation of a resident.
11. Waiver of any of the rights guaranteed by this chapter may not be made a condition of
admission to a facility or ongoing residence.
3.12. Each facility shall prepare a written plan and provide staff training to implement this chapter.
4.13. The department shall develop and coordinate with the facility licensing and regulatory
agencies a relocation plan in the event a facility is decertified or unlicensed.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 50-10.2-02.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-10.2-02.1. Authorized electronic monitoring - Penalty.
1. A resident and the resident representative may treat the resident's living quarters as the
resident's home and, subject to rules to protect the privacy and safety of another resident,
may purchase and use a technology device of the resident's choice, including a technology
device that may facilitate virtual monitoring or virtual visitation with family and other persons,

S. B. NO. 2070 - PAGE 6
provided operation and use of the technology device does not violate an individual's right to
privacy under state or federal law. Subsections 3 through 12 apply if a technology device or a
virtual monitoring device is used to record.
2. A resident may use a device of the resident's choice that facilitates virtual monitoring,
provided:
a. The purchase, activation, installation, maintenance, repair, deactivation, and removal of
such device is at the expense of the resident; and
b. The device and images obtained from the device are used by the resident and any
person communicating with the resident in a manner that does not violate an individual's
right to privacy under state or federal law.
3. A facility shall permit a resident or the resident representative to conduct authorized electronic
monitoringrecording of the resident's room through an authorized electronic
monitoringrecording device if:
a. The authorized electronic monitoringrecording device is placed in the resident's room;
b. The electronic monitoringrecording device is placed in a fixed, stationary position;
monitorsrecords only the area occupied by the resident and not the area occupied by the
resident's roommate; and protects the privacy and dignity of the resident;
c. The facility is given written notice of the placement and use which must include an
installation plan in compliance with the facility's standards and regulations the facility
providesshall provide to the resident;
d. A video tape or recording created using an authorized electronic monitoringrecording
device records the date and time;
e. All costs, except for electricity, associated with the authorized electronic
monitoringrecording device, including installation, operation, removal, repairs, room
damage, and maintenance, are paid by the resident or resident representative who
initiated the use of the authorized electronic monitoringrecording device; and
f. A signed authorization for the disclosure of protected health information, as defined by
title 45, Code of Federal Regulations, part 160, section 103, compliant with the federal
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 [Pub. L. 104-191; 110 Stat.
1936; 29 U.S.C. 1181 et seq.] and consenting to the use of the device is given by each
resident occupying the same room, or by that resident's resident representative in
accordance with subsection 45.
2. A facility that uses an authorized electronic monitoring device in compliance with this chapter
is not guilty of a crime or civilly liable under this code for a violation of a resident's privacy.
3.4. The facility shall cooperate to accommodate the placement of the authorized electronic
monitoringrecording device, unless doing so would place undue burden on the facility.
4.5. Before placing and using the authorized electronic monitoringrecording device or virtual
monitoring device, a resident or resident representative shall obtain the signed authorization of
any other resident residing in the room in accordance with subsection 13. The authorization
may be signed by thatthe resident's resident representative.
a. The resident's or the resident representative's authorization may limit the use of an
authorized electronic monitoringrecording device to only audio monitoringrecording or
only video monitoringrecording and may limit the device's time of operation, direction,
and focus.

S. B. NO. 2070 - PAGE 7
b. At any time, a resident or resident representative who did not request the authorized
electronic monitoringrecording device in the resident's room may withdraw, in writing, the
signed authorization for the use of the device. The resident who requested the device or
the resident's resident representative is responsible for having the device disabled in
compliance with the facility's standards and regulations after receipt of the written
withdrawal.
5.6. The facility shall make a reasonable attempt to accommodate a resident if a resident or
resident representative of a resident who is residing in a shared room wants to have an
authorized electronic monitoringrecording device placed in the room and another resident
living in the same shared room refuses to authorize the use of the authorized electronic
monitoring device.
6.7. If authorized electronic monitoringrecording is being conducted in the room of a resident, and
another resident will be moved into the room, the resident who requested the device or the
resident's resident representative is responsible for having the existing authorized electronic
monitoringrecording device disabled in compliance with the facility's standards and regulations
unless the new resident or the resident's resident representative authorizes the device
pursuant to subsections 13 and 45.
7.8. A facility may not refuse to admit an individual and may not remove a resident from a facility
because of authorized electronic monitoringrecording of a resident's room. A person may not
intentionally retaliate or discriminate against a resident for authorization of authorized
electronic monitoringrecording.
8.9. A facility clearly and conspicuously shall post a sign where authorized electronic
monitoringrecording is being conducted to alert and inform visitors.
9.10. A facility or staff of the facility may not access any video or audio recording created through an
authorized electronic monitoringrecording device placed in a resident's room without the
written consent of the resident or resident representative or court order.
10.11. A personAn individual that intentionally hampers, obstructs, tampers with, or destroys a
recording or an authorized electronic monitoringrecording device or virtual monitoring device
placed in a resident's room, without the express written consent of the resident or resident
representative, is subject to a class B misdemeanor. A personAn individual that places an
electronic monitoringrecording device in the room of a resident or which uses or discloses a
tape or other recording made by the device may be guilty of a crime or civilly liable for any
unlawful violation of the privacy rights of another. In any civil proceeding, administrative
proceeding, or survey process, material obtained through the use of an authorized electronic
monitoringrecording device may not be used if a personan individual intentionally hampered,
obstructed, or tampered with the material without the express written consent of the resident
or resident representative, or if the material was obtained through the operation of an
electronic monitoringrecording device which was not compliant with this section.
11.12. A person may not intercept a communication or disclose or use an intercepted communication
of an authorized electronic monitoringrecording device or a virtual monitoring device placed in
a resident's room, without the express written consent of the resident or the resident
representative.

S. B. NO. 2070 - PAGE 8
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2070.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State